Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 4

Youth Investment Act of 1970

37-3-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Youth Investment Act of 1970.”

Acts 1970, ch. 602, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-1301.

37-3-402. Office of community contact — Creation — Director — Personnel.

There is created within the department of education, in the division of vocational rehabilitation, an office of community contact, which shall be headed by a director, appointed by the commissioner of education, to serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and at a salary to be fixed by the commissioner. The commissioner shall employ such stenographic assistants as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this part, and shall fix stenographers' salaries.

Acts 1970, ch. 602, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-1302.

Cross-References. Commissioner of education, §4-3-802.

Vocational rehabilitation, title 49, ch. 11, parts 6-8.

37-3-403. Duties of office.

The office of community contact shall establish programs to provide guidance, training and rehabilitation for juveniles committed to correctional institutions who have been released from such institutions or who are under the care or custody of the juvenile court. The office shall carry out such programs enlisting the use of volunteer citizens, who shall receive no compensation for their services. The director is authorized to recruit and train such volunteer citizens and to administer the programs authorized by this part.

Acts 1970, ch. 602, § 3; T.C.A., § 37-1303.

37-3-404. Duties of director.

It is the duty of the director to:

Solicit volunteer citizens from throughout the state, using the aid of civic and church groups, at the director's discretion;

Work with the administrators of correctional institutions within the state and with state and local juvenile authorities;

Evaluate prospective volunteer citizens and establish screening procedures to make the final determination of which volunteers will be used in the contact program;

Coordinate and control the contact program and conduct training sessions for the volunteer citizens; and

Formulate rules, regulations and procedures for the implementation of this part.

The director may appoint volunteer citizens as the director thinks advisable to aid in these programs.

Acts 1970, ch. 602, § 4; T.C.A., § 37-1304.

37-3-405. Volunteers' duties.

It is the duty of the director to recruit volunteers who will:

Write the juvenile to whom the volunteer is assigned approximately one (1) time per week during the period the juvenile remains within a correctional institution;

Personally contact the juvenile approximately one (1) time per week after the juvenile's release from the correctional institution and until the juvenile reaches twenty-one (21) years of age; and

Prepare periodic reports as required, which shall be submitted to the director, evaluating the progress of the juvenile to whom the volunteer is assigned.

Acts 1970, ch. 602, § 5; T.C.A., § 37-1305.

37-3-406. Application for funds — Authorization.

The director is authorized to make application for and to receive federal funds and funds from any public or private source.

Acts 1970, ch. 602, § 6; T.C.A., § 37-1306.